Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB535.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Health Insurance Protection Against Limitations Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commissioner." The Insurance Commissioner of the Commonwealth."Department." The Insurance Department of the Commonwealth."Enrollee." A policyholder, subscriber, covered person or other individual who is entitled to receive health care services under a health insurance policy.123456789101112131415161718 "Group health insurance policy." A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage on an annual basis to individuals who obtain health insurance coverage through a group."Health insurance policy." A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage. The term does not include any of the following:(1) An accident only policy.(2) A credit only policy.(3) A long-term care or disability income policy.(4) A specified disease policy.(5) A Medicare supplement policy.(6) A fixed indemnity policy.(7) A dental only policy.(8) A vision only policy.(9) A workers' compensation policy.(10) An automobile medical payment policy.(11) A policy under which benefits are provided by the Federal Government to active or former military personnel and their dependents.(12) A hospital indemnity policy.(13) Any other similar policies providing for limited benefits."Individual health insurance policy." A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage on an annual basis to an individual other than in connection with a group."In-network provider." A provider who contracts with an 20250HB0535PN0528 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 insurer to provide health care services to an enrollee under a health insurance policy."Insurer." An entity that offers, issues or renews an individual or group health insurance policy that provides medical or health care coverage by a health care facility or licensed health care provider and that is governed under any of the following:(1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV of The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations).(4) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations)."Out-of-network provider." A provider who does not contract with an insurer to provide health care services to an enrollee under a health insurance policy.Section 3. Limitation on annual and lifetime limits.(a) Limits generally prohibited.--Except as otherwise provided in this section, an insurer offering, issuing or renewing an individual or group health insurance policy may not establish, on either an annual or lifetime basis, a limit on the dollar value of any core benefit for an enrollee, whether provided by an in-network or out-of-network provider.(b) Core benefit.--For purposes of this section, a core benefit shall include a benefit for which no annual or lifetime per enrollee limit was permitted to be included in an individual or small group policy first offered or issued in this 20250HB0535PN0528 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth in plan year 2025.(c) No coverage requirement.--This section shall not be construed to require coverage of any specific benefit.Section 4. Regulations.(a) Authority to promulgate.--The department may promulgate regulations as may be necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this act.(b) (Reserved).Section 5. Enforcement.(a) Penalties.--Upon satisfactory evidence of the violation of any section of this act by an insurer or any other person, one or more of the following penalties may be imposed at the commissioner's discretion:(1) Suspension or revocation of the license of the offending insurer or other person.(2) Refusal, for a period not to exceed one year, to issue a new license to the offending insurer or other person.(3) A fine of not more than $5,000 for each violation of this act.(4) A fine of not more than $10,000 for each willful violation of this act.(b) Limitation.--(1) Fines imposed against an individual insurer under this act may not exceed $500,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(2) Fines imposed against any other person under this act may not exceed $100,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(c) Additional remedies.--The enforcement remedies imposed under this section are in addition to any other remedies or 20250HB0535PN0528 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 penalties that may be imposed under any other applicable law of this Commonwealth, including:(1) The act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act. Violations of this act shall be deemed to be an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.(2) The act of December 18, 1996 (P.L.1066, No.159), known as the Accident and Health Filing Reform Act.(3) The act of June 25, 1997 (P.L.295, No.29), known as the Pennsylvania Health Care Insurance Portability Act.(d) Administrative procedure.--The administrative provisions of this section shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies). A party against whom penalties are assessed in an administrative action may appeal to Commonwealth Court as provided in 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 6. Notice.The commissioner shall transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin if any of the following occurs:(1) The Congress of the United States repeals 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-11 (relating to no lifetime or annual limits), in whole or in part.(2) A court of the United States abrogates, vacates or invalidates 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-11, in whole or in part, or a regulation implementing 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-11, in whole or in part.(3) The executive branch of the United States refuses to 20250HB0535PN0528 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enforce or repeals a regulation implementing 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-11, in whole or in part.Section 7. Implementation.The implementation of this act shall be limited to the provisions necessary to achieve a substitute coverage requirement for the portion or portions of 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-11 (relating to no lifetime or annual limits) that are impacted by the occurrence of any of the events described in section 6.Section 8. Repeals.All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect immediately:Section 6.Section 7.This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect upon publication of the notice in section 6.20250HB0535PN0528 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819